Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4113
Excise tax; stored dry peas and lentils.

The tax provided for by section 2-4111 shall be deducted as provided by the Dry Pea and Lentil Resources Act, whether such dry peas and lentils are stored in this or any other state.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 13.
November 14, 2020